test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kutsw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kutsõ: # Verb 34 'eng /est kutsuda/fin' - full paradigm
     kutsõ+V+Inf: kutsõ
     kutsõ+V+Ger: kutsõs
     kutsõ+V+Sup: kutsõm
     kutsõ+V+Sup+Ine: kutsõmõs
     kutsõ+V+Sup+Ela: kutsõmõst
     kutsõ+V+Sup+Tra: kutsõmõks
     kutsõ+V+Sup+Abe: kutsõmõt
     kutsõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kutsūb
     kutsõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kutsõt
     kutsõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kutsūbõd
     kutsõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kutsīz
     kutsõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kutsīzt, kutsīztõ]
     kutsõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kutsīzt, kutsīztõ]
     kutsõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kuts
     kutsõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kutsõks
     kutsõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kuts
     kutsõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kuts
     kutsõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kutsõgid
     kutsõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kutsõg
     kutsõ+V+Quo+Sg3: kutsiji
     kutsõ+V+ActPrfPrc: kutsõn
     kutsõ+V+PssPrfPrc: kutstõd
